Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.711

License fees or taxes on certain business activities—Excess rates authorized by voters.

The qualified voters of any city or town may by majority vote approve rates in excess of the provisions of RCW 35.21.710.

[ 1982 1st ex.s. c 49 s 8.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Effective date—Fire district funding—1982 1st ex.s. c 49: See notes following RCW 35.21.710.